Illinois, session 104th, SB290.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 12-3.4 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/12-3.4)  (was 720 ILCS 5/12-30)7    Sec. 12-3.4. Violation of an order of protection. 8    (a) A person commits violation of an order of protection 9if:10        (1) He or she knowingly commits an act which was 11    prohibited by a court or fails to commit an act which was 12    ordered by a court in violation of:13            (i) a remedy in a valid order of protection 14        authorized under paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (14), or 15        (14.5) of subsection (b) of Section 214 of the 16        Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986,17            (ii) a remedy, which is substantially similar to 18        the remedies authorized under paragraphs (1), (2), 19        (3), (14) or (14.5) of subsection (b) of Section 214 of 20        the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986, in a valid 21        order of protection, which is authorized under the 22        laws of another state, tribe or United States 23        territory,  SB0290- 2 -LRB104 03950 RLC 13974 b1            (iii) any other remedy when the act constitutes a 2        crime against the protected parties as the term 3        protected parties is defined in Section 112A-4 of the 4        Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963; and5        (2) Such violation occurs after the offender has been 6    served notice of the contents of the order, pursuant to 7    the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 or any 8    substantially similar statute of another state, tribe or 9    United States territory, or otherwise has acquired actual 10    knowledge of the contents of the order.11    An order of protection issued by a state, tribal or 12territorial court related to domestic or family violence shall 13be deemed valid if the issuing court had jurisdiction over the 14parties and matter under the law of the state, tribe or 15territory. There shall be a presumption of validity where an 16order is certified and appears authentic on its face. For 17purposes of this Section, an "order of protection" may have 18been issued in a criminal or civil proceeding. 19    (a-5) Failure to provide reasonable notice and opportunity 20to be heard shall be an affirmative defense to any charge or 21process filed seeking enforcement of a foreign order of 22protection.23    (b) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to diminish 24the inherent authority of the courts to enforce their lawful 25orders through civil or criminal contempt proceedings.26    (c) The limitations placed on law enforcement liability by   SB0290- 3 -LRB104 03950 RLC 13974 b1Section 305 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 2apply to actions taken under this Section.3    (d) Violation of an order of protection is a Class 4 felony 4A misdemeanor. Violation of an order of protection is a Class 3 54 felony if the defendant has any prior conviction under this 6Code for domestic battery (Section 12-3.2) or violation of an 7order of protection (Section 12-3.4 or 12-30) or any prior 8conviction under the law of another jurisdiction for an 9offense that could be charged in this State as a domestic 10battery or violation of an order of protection. Violation of 11an order of protection is a Class 3 4 felony if the defendant 12has any prior conviction under this Code for first degree 13murder (Section 9-1), attempt to commit first degree murder 14(Section 8-4), aggravated domestic battery (Section 12-3.3), 15aggravated battery (Section 12-3.05 or 12-4), heinous battery 16(Section 12-4.1), aggravated battery with a firearm (Section 1712-4.2), aggravated battery with a machine gun or a firearm 18equipped with a silencer (Section 12-4.2-5), aggravated 19battery of a child (Section 12-4.3), aggravated battery of an 20unborn child (subsection (a-5) of Section 12-3.1, or Section 2112-4.4), aggravated battery of a senior citizen (Section 2212-4.6), stalking (Section 12-7.3), aggravated stalking 23(Section 12-7.4), criminal sexual assault (Section 11-1.20 or 2412-13), aggravated criminal sexual assault (Section 11-1.30 or 2512-14), kidnapping (Section 10-1), aggravated kidnapping 26(Section 10-2), predatory criminal sexual assault of a child   SB0290- 4 -LRB104 03950 RLC 13974 b1(Section 11-1.40 or 12-14.1), aggravated criminal sexual abuse 2(Section 11-1.60 or 12-16), unlawful restraint (Section 10-3), 3aggravated unlawful restraint (Section 10-3.1), aggravated 4arson (Section 20-1.1), aggravated discharge of a firearm 5(Section 24-1.2), or a violation of any former law of this 6State that is substantially similar to any listed offense, or 7any prior conviction under the law of another jurisdiction for 8an offense that could be charged in this State as one of the 9offenses listed in this Section, when any of these offenses 10have been committed against a family or household member as 11defined in Section 112A-3 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 121963. The court shall impose a minimum penalty of 24 hours 13imprisonment for defendant's second or subsequent violation of 14any order of protection; unless the court explicitly finds 15that an increased penalty or such period of imprisonment would 16be manifestly unjust. In addition to any other penalties, the 17court may order the defendant to pay a fine as authorized under 18Section 5-9-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections or to make 19restitution to the victim under Section 5-5-6 of the Unified 20Code of Corrections.21    (e) (Blank).22    (f) A defendant who directed the actions of a third party 23to violate this Section, under the principles of 24accountability set forth in Article 5 of this Code, is guilty 25of violating this Section as if the same had been personally 26done by the defendant, without regard to the mental state of   SB0290- 5 -LRB104 03950 RLC 13974 b1the third party acting at the direction of the defendant.2(Source: P.A. 100-987, eff. 7-1-19.) 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.